District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

48-606

Pasteurization requirement.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 27, 1925, 43 Stat. 1005, ch. 358, § 6
Aug. 1, 1950, 64 Stat. 1005, ch. 513, § 1
Jan. 5, 1971, 84 Stat. 1937, Pub. L. 91-650, title VI, § 601(a)
May 2, 2002, D.C. Law 14-116, § 8(b), 49 DCR 1945

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 33-306.
1973 Ed., § 33-306.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of §§ 48-601 to 48-610, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-55, December 6, 2001, law notification 49 DCR 356).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-128, August 3, 2001, 48 DCR 7939).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 8(b) of Food Regulation Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-147, October 23, 2001, 48 DCR 10183).

Transfer of Functions

The functions of the Department of Health, Education and Welfare were transferred to the Department of Health and Human Services by the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 675, Pub. L. 96-88, § 509.